Hawaii statutes.
[§659-6] Judgment as to offices; burden of
proof. [(a)] If a person to whom an order is directed with respect to an
office of which the person performs the duties does not answer within the time
allowed or the answer is insufficient or it is found that the person has
usurped the office or continues in it unlawfully, the court in addition to
declaring the person not qualified to fill the office and forbidding the person
to perform the duties of the office any longer, may direct that a new
appointment be made and may grant other appropriate relief.

[(b)] If the proceeding is commenced by
verified petition of the attorney general and concerns a public office, the
respondent shall have the burden of proof. [L 1876, c 39, §41; RL 1925, §2721;
RL 1935, §4263; RL 1945, §10284; RL 1955, §236-24; HRS §659-51; am L 1972, c
90, §3(f); ren HRS §659-6; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next